Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1391 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:

Req. No. 12416 Page 1

1. "Favorable" means that there is a reasonable probability
that the outcome of the proceeding would have been different;
2. "Forensic science" is the application of scientific or
technical practices to the recognition, collection, analysis, and
interpretation of evidence for criminal and civil law or regulatory
issues;
3. "Forensic scientific evidence" shall include:
a. scientific or technical knowledge,
b. scientific or technical knowledge or opinion by a
testifying forensic analyst or expert,
c. reports or testimony offered by experts or forensic
analysts,
d. scientific standards, or
e. a scientific method or technique upon which the
relevant forensic scientific evidence is based; and
4. "Scientific knowledge" shall include the knowledge of the
general scientific community and all fields of scientific knowledge
on which those fields or disciplines rely.
B. The provisions of this section applies to relevant forensic
scientific evidence that:
1. Was not available to be offered by a convicted person at the
trial of the convicted person; or
2. Undermines forensic scientific evidence presented at trial.

Req. No. 12416 Page 2

C. The district court in which a person was convicted may grant
a convicted person relief if:
1. The convicted person files an application under the
provisions of this section asserting that relevant forensic
scientific evidence is currently available and either:
a. was not ascertainable through the exercise of
reasonable diligence by the convicted person before or
during trial, or
b. undermines forensic scientific evidence presented at
trial; and
2. The court makes the findings described by subdivision (1) of
paragraph 1 of this section and finds that, had the evidence been
presented at trial, there is a reasonable likelihood there would
have been a different outcome at the trial.
D. In determining whether relevant forensic scientific evidence
was not ascertainable through the exercise of reasonable diligence
on or before a specific date, the court shall consider whether the
relevant scientific evidence has changed since:
1. The applicable trial date or dates, or date of entry of a
guilty plea or nolo contendere plea, for a determination made with
respect to an original application; or
2. The date on which an original application or a previously
considered application, as applicable, was filed, for a
determination made with respect to a subsequent application.
Req. No. 12416 Page 3

E. The provisions of this section shall not create additional
liabilities for an expert who repudiates his or her original opinion
provided at a hearing or trial or whose opinion has been undermined
by later scientific research or technological advancements.
F. A person convicted of a crime who asserts that he or she did
not commit that crime may file a petition relating to forensic
scientific evidence that was not available at trial or that
contradicts forensic scientific evidence presented at trial.
Eligible applicants shall include any and all of the following:
1. Persons currently incarcerated, persons civilly committed,
persons on parole or probation, or persons subject to sex offender
registration;
2. Persons convicted on a plea of not guilty, guilty or nolo
contendere;
3. Persons deemed to have provided a confession or admission
related to the crime, either before or after conviction; and
4. Persons who have completed their sentences.
G. Upon the filing of a motion under the provisions of this
act, the petitioner shall serve a copy of such motion upon the
attorney for the state. The state shall respond within sixty (60)
days of the receipt of service. The court shall hear the motion no
sooner than thirty (30) days and no later than ninety (90) days
after the filing of the motion.

Req. No. 12416 Page 4

H. If the court determines that the new forensic scientific
evidence offered by the petitioner is not favorable to the
petitioner, the court shall dismiss the petition.
I. If the new evidence is favorable to the petitioner, the
court shall hold a hearing to determine the appropriate relief to be
granted and enter any order that serves the interest of justice,
including:
1. An order setting aside or vacating the judgment of
conviction of the petitioner, judgment of not guilty by reason of
mental disease or defect, or adjudication of delinquency;
2. An order granting the petitioner a new trial or fact-finding
hearing;
3. An order granting the petitioner a new sentencing hearing,
commitment hearing, or dispositional hearing;
4. An order discharging the petitioner from custody; or
5. An order granting the petitioner additional discovery on
matters related to forensic evidence used to obtain the conviction
or sentence under attack including, but not limited to, documents
pertaining to the original criminal investigation or the identities
of other suspects.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12416 GRS 02/06/25

Req. No. 12416 Page 5